District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Dram Shop Clarification and Liquor Liability Insurance Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 25-787(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3)(A) In any civil action brought pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the total
liability for non-economic damages in any such action shall not exceed $500,000.”.
“(B) Beginning on January 1, 2037, and on January 1st of every 10 years
after January 1, 2037, the amount provided in paragraph (1) shall increase by $50,000.”.
Sec. 3. Section 4 of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Establishment
Act of 1996, effective May 21, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-268; D.C. Official Code § 31-103), is
amended by adding a new subsection (a-1) to read as follows:
“(a-1) Within 180 days after the effective date of the Dram Shop Clarification and Liquor


Liability Insurance Amendment Act of 2026, introduced on July 14, 2026 (introduced version of
B26- ___), the Department of Insurance, Securities and Banking (“Department”) shall conduct
an analysis determining whether requiring minimum liquor liability insurance coverage would
decrease existing liquor liability insurance premiums for nightlife establishments in the District.
In conducting the analysis, the Department shall include a comparison of how other states’
minimum liquor liability insurance coverage impacts liquor liability insurance premiums and any
other relevant issues the Department identifies.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).